New York, session 2025-2026, S2568.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The New York city charter is amended by adding a new 2 section 1055 to read as follows: 3 § 1055. Private contracts for materials prohibited. Except where 4 expressly permitted by law, the New York city board of elections shall 5 not enter into any contract or agreement with any person, firm, corpo- 6 ration, or other entity, that does not employ union labor, for the prep- 7 aration, design, printing, mailing, distribution, delivery, processing, 8 or counting of ballots, affidavits, petitions, applications, or other 9 papers and materials involved in the conduct of elections and the 10 canvass of results under this chapter. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04987-01-5